Utah statutes.
56-1-34.   First-aid kits -- Extension of time for equipping cabooses.
Any common carrier railroad which is unable on or before the effective date of
this act to equip its cabooses as prescribed herein may apply to the Public
Service Commission for extension of time. The commission may grant additional
time, not to exceed six months from the effective date of this act, and during
such period the common carrier railroad shall not be subject to the penalty
prescribed by Section 56-1-33.
